Utah statutes.
75-5-407.   Procedure concerning hearing and order on original petition.
(1) Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other
protective order because of minority, the court shall set a date for the
hearing on the matters alleged in the petition. If, at any time in the
proceeding, the court determines that the interests of the minor are or may be
inadequately represented, it may appoint an attorney to represent the minor,
giving consideration to the choice of the minor if 14 years of age or older. A
lawyer appointed by the court to represent a minor has the powers and duties
of a guardian ad litem.
(2)  Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other
protective order for reasons other than minority, the court shall set a date
for hearing. Unless the person to be protected has counsel of his own choice,
the court may appoint a lawyer to represent him who then has the powers and
duties of a guardian ad litem. If the alleged disability is mental illness,
mental deficiency, physical illness or disability, advanced age, chronic use
of drugs, or chronic intoxication, the court may direct that the person to be
protected be examined by a physician designated by the court, preferably a
physician who is not connected with any institution in which the person is a
patient or is detained. The court may send a visitor to interview the person
to be protected. The visitor may be a guardian ad litem or an officer or
employee of the court.
(3)  After hearing, upon finding that a basis for the appointment of a
conservator or other protective order has been established, the court shall
make an appointment or other appropriate protective order.
